Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5022.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Social Security number and individual taxpayer identification number. new text end new text begin If an insurance company requires a new customer to provide a Social Security number on an application for insurance coverage, the insurance company must accept an individual taxpayer identification number in lieu of a Social Security number. The insurance coverage application must indicate that the insurance company accepts an individual taxpayer identification number. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to insurance coverage offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end